Washington statutes.
RCW 41.33.030

Effective date for coverage of members.

The effective date of OASI coverage for members of the teachers' retirement system shall be January 1, 1956: PROVIDED, That should the agreement between the governor and the secretary of health, education and welfare be executed subsequent to December 31, 1957, the effective date of coverage shall be that specified in the agreement.

[ 1957 c 183 s 5.]